Utah statutes.
17B-1-905.   Right of entry on premises of water user.

A person authorized by a local district that provides a service from a water system or sewer system may enter upon a premise furnished with or provided that water service or sewer service to:

(1)  examine an apparatus related to or used by the water system or sewer system;

(2)  examine the amount of water used or wastewater discharged by the water system or sewer system and the manner of use or discharge; or

(3)  make a necessary shutoff for vacancy, delinquency, or a violation of a local district rule or regulation relating to the water service or sewer service.

